Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.260

Oath of jurors.

When the jury has been selected, an oath or affirmation shall be administered to the jurors, in substance that they and each of them, will well, and truly try, the matter in issue between the plaintiff and defendant, and a true verdict give, according to the law and evidence as given them on the trial.

[ 2003 c 406 s 14; Code 1881 s 220; 1877 p 46 s 224; 1869 p 54 s 224; RRS s 338.]

NOTES:

Oaths and mode of administering: State Constitution Art. 1 s 6.